District of Columbia statutes.
44-414

Judicial review of certificate of need decisions.

Any person who contests the final decision on an application for a certificate of need, or for exemption from certificate of need review under this chapter, after the exhaustion of all administrative remedies, is entitled to judicial review thereof upon filing in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals a written petition for review pursuant to § 2-510.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 15, 43 DCR 4535
1981 Ed., § 32-364.